Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
TRADE NAMES

Note

Part II reconstituted by L 2008, c 108, §3 and amended by L
2008, c 108, §6.

§482-2 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1980, c 26,
§3.

§482-2 Certificate. (a) Any person
desiring to register any trade name may obtain a certificate of registration of
the trade name in the manner hereinafter provided.

(b) Before any person may receive a
certificate of registration of a trade name, the person shall file in the
office of the director an application for the registration thereof, with a certified
declaration stating that the person is the sole and original proprietor of the
trade name or the assign of the proprietor and setting forth the nature of
business in which the trade name is used.

(c) Upon filing the application, the applicant
shall pay to the director a fee of $50. A special handling fee of $20 for
expediting registration of a trade name shall be assessed by the director. All
special handling fees shall be credited to the compliance resolution fund
established under section 26-9(o). [L 1888, c 4, §1; RL 1925, §3573; am L 1925,
c 174, pt of §1; RL 1935, §7450; RL 1945, §9285; RL 1955, §204-1; HRS §482-1;
am and ren L 1980, c 26, §2; am L 1983, c 153, §3; am L 1984, c 118, §6; am L
1985, c 189, §8; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 22, §3; am L 1996, c 181, §6; am L
1999, c 129, §19; am L 2001, c 15, §4; am L 2002, c 130, §§110, 111; am L 2003,
c 124, §83]

Cross References

Modification of fees, see §92-28.

Attorney General Opinions

Regarding requirements for registration of exclusive trade
name. Att. Gen. Op. 66-17.

Case Notes

Trade names may be established without registration under
statute; common law right. 37 H. 382.

The Hawaii Uniform Trade Secrets Act preempts non-contract
civil claims based upon the alleged acquisition, disclosure, or use of
confidential information that does not rise to the level of a
statutorily-defined trade secret. 123 H. 314, 235 P.3d 310 (2010).

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next